fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Accessoires pour moniteurs biométriques: Accessoires pour moniteurs d’activité; Accessoires pour lecteurs de glycémie; Accessoires pour tensiomètres; Accessoires pour pèse-personnes; Accessoires pour systèmes de mesure continue du glucose (CGM); Accessoires pour thermomètres médicaux; Accessoires pour moniteurs de rythme cardiaque fœtal; Accessoires pour oxymètres de pouls
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Biyometrik Monitör Aksesuarları: Aktivite Monitörü Aksesuarları; Şeker Ölçüm Cihazı Aksesuarları; Tansiyon Aleti Aksesuarları; Tartı Aksesuarları; Sürekli Glikoz İzleme (CGM) Aksesuarları; Tıbbi Termometre Aksesuarları; Doğum Öncesi Kalp Atış Hızı Monitörü Aksesuarları; Nabız Oksimetre Aksesuarları
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Biometrisen monitorin lisätarvikkeet: Aktiivisuusmittarin lisätarvikkeet; Veren glukoosimittarin lisätarvikkeet; Verenpainemittarin lisätarvikkeet; Henkilövaa'an lisätarvikkeet; Jatkuva verensokerimittarilisävaruste (CGM); Lääkinnällinen lämpömittarilisävaruste; Raskaudenaikainen syketaajuusmittarilisävaruste; Pulssioksimetrilisävaruste
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Biometrikus felügyeleti eszköz kiegészítők: Tevékenységfelügyeleti eszköz kiegészítők; Vércukormérő-kiegészítők; Vérnyomásmérő-kiegészítők; Testsúlymérleg-kiegészítők; Folyamatos glükózfigyelő (CGM) -kiegészítők; Orvosihőmérő-kiegészítők; Prenatális szívfrekvencia-figyelő kiegészítők; Pulzoximeter kiegészítők
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Akcesoria do monitorów funkcji życiowych: Akcesoria do monitorów aktywności; Akcesoria do glukometrów; Akcesoria do ciśnieniomierzy; Akcesoria do wag osobowych; Akcesoria do ciągłego monitorowania glukozy (CGM); Akcesoria do termometrów medycznych; Akcesoria do monitorów tętna płodu; Akcesoria do pulsoksymetrów
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Accesorii monitor biometric: Accesorii pentru monitoare activitate; Accesorii pentru glucometru; Accesorii pentru monitorul tensiunii arteriale; Accesorii pentru cântare de greutate corporală; Accesorii pentru monitoare continue de glucoză (CGM); Accesorii pentru termometre medicale; Accesorii pentru monitoare prenatale de ritm cardiac; Accesorii pentru pulsoximetru
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Tilbehør til biometriske målere: Tilbehør til aktivitetsmålere; Tilbehør til blodsukkermålere; Tilbehør til blodtryksmålere; Tilbehør til badevægte; kontinuerlig blodsukkermåler (CGM) – tilbehør; Medicinsk termometer – tilbehør; Prænatal hjertefrekvensmåler – tilbehør; Pulsoximeter – tilbehør
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Αξεσουάρ βιομετρικής οθόνης: Αξεσουάρ παρακολούθησης δραστηριότητας; Αξεσουάρ μετρητή γλυκόζης αίματος; Αξεσουάρ για πιεσόμετρα; Αξεσουάρ ζυγαριάς σώματος; Αξεσουάρ συνεχούς μέτρησης γλυκόζης (CGM); Αξεσουάρ ιατρικού θερμομέτρου; Αξεσουάρ προγεννητικού καρδιακού monitor; Αξεσουάρ παλμικού οξύμετρου
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 医療用測定器関連用品: 活動計測器具用関連用品; 血糖値測定器関連用品; 血圧計関連用品; 体重計関連用品; 持続血糖測定器（CGM）用アクセサリー; 医療用体温計アクセサリー; 胎児心拍計用アクセサリー; パルスオキシメーター用アクセサリー
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 생체신호 모니터 부대용품: 생체신호 감지기 부대용품; 혈당 측정기 부대용품; 혈압 측정기 부대용품; 체중계 부대용품; 연속 혈당 모니터 (CGM) 액세서리; 의료용 체온계 액세서리; 태아 심박수 모니터 액세서리; 맥박 산소 측정기 액세서리
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Acessórios de monitorização biométrica: Acessórios de monitorização de atividade; Acessórios de medição de glicose no sangue; Acessórios de monitorização da pressão arterial; Acessórios de balança de peso corporal; Acessórios para monitores contínuos de glicose (cgm); Acessórios para termómetros médicos; Acessórios para monitores de frequência cardíaca pré-natal; Acessórios para oxímetros de pulso
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Měřiče tělesných funkcí – příslušenství: Příslušenství ke krokoměrům; Glukometry – příslušenství; Monitory krevního tlaku – příslušenství; Osobní váhy – příslušenství; Příslušenství k nepřetržitým glukometrům (CGM); Příslušenství ke zdravotním teploměrům; Příslušenství k prenatálním monitorům srdečního tepu; Příslušenství k pulsním oxymetrům
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 生物監測器配件: 活動監測器配件; 血糖機配件; 血壓監測器配件; 體重計配件; 連續血糖監測系統 (CGM) 配件; 醫用溫度計配件; 產前心率監測器配件; 脈搏血氧儀配件
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Accesorios para dispositivos biométricos: Accesorios para monitores de actividad; Accesorios para medidores de glucosa en sangre; Accesorios para monitores de tensión arterial; Accesorios para básculas de peso corporal; Accesorios de monitor continuo de glucosa (MCG); Accesorios de termómetro médico; Accesorios de monitor de frecuencia cardíaca prenatal; Accesorios de pulsioxímetro
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Príslušenstvo pre biometrické monitory: Príslušenstvo pre monitory aktivity; Príslušenstvo pre glukomery; Príslušenstvo k tlakomeru; Príslušenstvo k osobnej váhe; Príslušenstvo pre kontinuálne glukózové monitory (CGM); Príslušenstvo pre lekárske teplomery; Príslušenstvo pre prenatálne monitory srdcovej frekvencie; Príslušenstvo pre pulzné oxymetre
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Zubehör für biometrische Messgeräte: Zubehör für Aktivitätsmonitore; Blutzuckermessung; Zubehör für Blutdrucküberwachungsgeräte; Zubehör für Badezimmerwaagen; Zubehör für kontinuierliche Glukosemessgeräte (CGM); Medizinisches Thermometer-Zubehör; Zubehör für pränatale Herzfrequenzmonitore; Pulsoximeter-Zubehör
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Tilbehør for biometrisk overvåkning: Tilbehør for aktivitetsovervåkning; Tilbehør til blodsukkermålere; Tilbehør til blodtrykksapparater; Tilbehør for kroppsvekter; Kontinuerlig glukosemåler (CGM) tilbehør; Medisinsk termometer tilbehør; Prenatal hjertefrekvensmonitor tilbehør; Pulsoksymeter tilbehør
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Phụ kiện thiết bị theo dõi sinh trắc: Phụ kiện máy theo dõi hoạt động; Phụ kiện đo lượng đường trong máu; Phụ kiện máy theo dõi huyết áp; Phụ kiện cân sức khỏe; Phụ kiện máy theo dõi đường huyết liên tục (CGM); Phụ kiện nhiệt kế y tế; Phụ kiện máy theo dõi nhịp tim thai nhi; Phụ kiện máy đo oxy máu
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Аксессуары для инструментов для измерения биометрических показателей: Аксессуары для мониторов активности; Аксессуары для глюкометров; Аксессуары для тонометров; Аксессуары для напольных весов; Аксессуары для систем непрерывного мониторинга глюкозы (CGM); Аксессуары для медицинских термометров; Аксессуары для пренатальных мониторов сердечного ритма; Аксессуары для пульсоксиметров
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Tillbehör till biometrimätare: Tillbehör till aktivitetsmonitor; Tillbehör till blodglykosmätare; Tillbehör till blodtrycksmätare; Tillbehör till personvågar; Kontinuerlig glukosmätare (CGM) tillbehör; Medicinska termometertillbehör; Prenatal hjärtfrekvensmätartillbehör; Pulsoximetertillbehör
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 生物体征监测器配件: 活动监测器配件; 血糖仪耗材; 血压计配件; 体重秤配件; 连续血糖监测器配件; 医用体温计配件; 产前心率监测器配件; 脉搏血氧仪配件
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Accessori lettori biometrici: Accessori per monitorare l'attività fisica; Accessori per misurazione glicemia; Accessori per misuratori di pressione sanguigna; Accessori pesapersone; Accessori del monitor glicemico continuo (CGM); Accessori del termometro medico; Accessori del monitor della frequenza cardiaca prenatale; Accessori dell'ossimetro
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Pribor za biometrijske monitore: Pribor za uređaje za praćenje aktivnosti; Pribor za mjerač razine glukoze u krvi; Pribor za mjerač krvnog tlaka; Pribor za vage za mjerenje težine; Dodatna oprema za kontinuirane monitore glukoze (CGM); Dodatna oprema za medicinske termometre; Dodatna oprema za prenatalne monitore otkucaja srca; Dodatna oprema za pulsne oksimetre
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Аксесоари за биометрични монитори: Аксесоари за монитор на активността; Аксесоари за глюкомери; Аксесоари за апарат за кръвно налягане; Аксесоари за везни на телесно тегло; Аксесоари за сензори за измерване на глюкозата; Аксесоари за медицински термометри; Аксесоари за пренатален монитор за сърдечна честота; Аксесоари за пулсоксиметър
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Biometrinių monitorių priedai: Aktyvumo monitorių priedai; Gliukozės kiekio kraujyje matuoklių priedai; Kraujo spaudimo monitorių priedai; Kūno svorio svarstyklių priedai; Nuolatinio gliukozės stebėjimo (CGM) priedai; Medicininių termometrų priedai; Prenatalinio širdies ritmo stebėjimo priedai; Pulsoksimetro priedai
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Acessórios para monitor biométrico: Acessórios para monitores de atividade; Acessórios para medição de glicose; Acessórios de monitoramento da pressão arterial; Acessórios para balança de banheiro; Acessórios para monitor contínuo de glicose (CGM); Acessórios para termômetro médico; Acessórios para monitor de frequência cardíaca pré-natal; Acessórios para oxímetro de pulso
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Dodatki za biometrične monitorje: Dodatki za monitorje za spremljanje dejavnosti; Dodatki za merilnike glukoze v krvi; Dodatki za merilnike krvnega tlaka; Dodatki za tehtnice za merjenje telesne teže; Dodatki za kontinuirane merilnike glukoze (CGM); Dodatki za medicinske termometre; Dodatki za prenatalne merilnike srčnega utripa; Dodatki za pulzne oksimetre
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Accessoires voor biometrische meters: Accessoires voor activiteitsmonitors; Accessoires voor bloedglucosemeter; Accessoires voor bloeddrukmonitoren; Accessoires voor badkamerweegschaal; Continue glucose monitor (CGM) accessoires; Medische thermometer accessoires; Prenatale hartslagmonitor accessoires; Pulsoximeter accessoires
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Biometric Monitor Accessories: Activity Monitor Accessories; Blood Glucose Meter Accessories; Blood Pressure Monitor Accessories; Body Weight Scale Accessories; Continuous Glucose Monitor (CGM) Accessories; Medical Thermometer Accessories; Prenatal Heart Rate Monitor Accessories; Pulse Oximeter Accessories
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องตรวจสอบชีวมิติ: อุปกรณ์เครื่องตรวจสอบกิจกรรม; อุปกรณ์เครื่องวัดกลูโคสในเลือด; อุปกรณ์เครื่องตรวจสอบความดันโลหิต; อุปกรณ์เครื่องชั่งน้ำหนักร่างกาย; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องวัดน้ำตาลต่อเนื่อง; อุปกรณ์เสริมเทอร์โมมิเตอร์ทางการแพทย์; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องฟังเสียงหัวใจทารกในครรภ์; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องวัดออกซิเจนในเลือด